ja: ココナッツの準備形状: チャンク; ダイス; すりおろし; ハーフカット; 果肉; ピース; パルプ; ピューレ; シュレッド; スライス; ホール; その他
hr-HR: Oblik za pripremu kokosa: Komadi; Narezano na kockice; Naribano; Prerezano napola; Meso; Komadići; Pulpa; Pire; Usitnjeno; Kriške; Cijelo; Ostalo
sk-SK: Forma na prípravu kokosu: Väčšie kúsky; Nakrájané na kocky; Strúhané; Prekrojené na polovicu; Dužina; Kúsky; Dreň; Pyré; Strúhané na rezance; Plátky; Celé; Iné
it: Forma di preparazione del cocco: A pezzi; A cubetti; Grattugiato; Tagliato a metà; Polpa solida; Pezzetti; Polpa morbida; Purea; A scaglie; A fette; Intero; Altro
zh-CN: 椰子制备形态: 块状; 丁状; 刨丝; 对半切; 椰肉; 碎块; 果肉; 果泥; 椰丝; 切片; 整颗; 其他
de: Zubereitungsform der Kokosnuss: Grobe Stücke; Gewürfelt; Gerieben; Halbiert; Kokosfleisch; Stücke; Pulpe; Püree; Geraspelt; Scheiben; Ganz; Andere
pt-PT: Forma de preparação do coco: Pedaços; Em cubos; Ralado; Cortado ao meio; Polpa; Pedaços; Polpa; Puré; Desfiado; Fatias; Inteiro; Outra
nb: Kokosnøttprepareringsskjema: Biter; I terninger; Revet; Halvkuttet; Kjøtt; Biter; Fruktkjøtt; Puré; Strimlet; Skiver; Hel; Annet
en: Coconut preparation form: Chunks; Diced; Grated; Half cut; Meat; Pieces; Pulp; Puree; Shredded; Slices; Whole; Other
fi: Kookoksen valmistusmuoto: Palat; Kuutioitu; Raastettu; Puolitettu; Hedelmäliha; Palaset; Massa; Sose; Raaste; Viipaleet; Kokonainen; Muu
ru: Форма подготовки кокоса: Кусочки; Кубики; Тертый; Половинки; Мякоть; Дольки; Мякоть (пюре); Пюре; Стружка; Слайсы; Цельный; Другое
pl: Forma przygotowania kokosa: Kawałki; W kostce; Starty; Połówki; Miąższ; Kawałeczki; Pulpa; Purée; Wiórki; Płatki; Cały; Inny
el: Φόρμα παρασκευής καρύδας: Μεγάλα κομμάτια; Σε κύβους; Τριμμένο; Κομμένο στη μέση; Ψίχα; Κομμάτια; Πολτός; Πουρές; Σε νιφάδες; Σε φέτες; Ολόκληρο; Άλλο
fr: Forme de préparation de la noix de coco: Gros morceaux; En dés; Râpé; Coupé en deux; Chair; Morceaux; Pulpe; Purée; En copeaux; Tranches; Entier; Autre
zh-TW: 椰子處理形式: 塊狀; 丁狀; 刨絲; 對半切; 椰肉; 碎塊; 果肉泥; 果泥; 切絲; 切片; 全顆; 其他
es: Forma de preparación del coco: Trozos; En cubitos; Rallado; Cortado a la mitad; Carne; Piezas; Pulpa; Puré; Desmenuzado; Rodajas; Entero; Otro
ro-RO: Formă de preparare a nucii de cocos: Bucăți mari; Cubulețe; Răzuit; Jumătăți; Miez; Bucăți; Pulpă; Piure; Mărunțit; Felii; Întreg; Altele
sv: Kokosnötsberedning: Bitar; Tärnad; Riven; Halverad; Fruktkött; Bitar; Massa; Puré; Strimlad; Skivor; Hel; Övrigt
tr: Hindistan cevizi hazırlama formu: Büyük parça; Küp doğranmış; Rendelenmiş; Yarım kesim; Etli kısım; Parça; Posa; Püre; Kıyılmış; Dilim; Bütün; Diğer
hu: Kókusz előkészítő forma: Darabok; Kockázott; Reszelt; Félbevágott; Hús; Darabok; Pép; Püré; Forgács; Szeletek; Egész; Egyéb
nl: Specificeert hoe de kokosnoot fysiek is bereid of gesneden, heel, gesneden, geraspt, gepureerd, enz., zodat kopers snel het formaat kunnen vinden dat ze nodig hebben voor recepten of snacks.: Stukken; In blokjes; Geraspt; Gehalveerd; Vlees; Stukjes; Pulp; Puree; Versnipperd; Plakjes; Heel; Overig
th: รูปแบบการเตรียมมะพร้าว: ก้อน; หั่นเต๋า; ขูด; ผ่าครึ่ง; เนื้อ; ชิ้น; เนื้อบด; น้ำข้น; ฝอย; แผ่น; ทั้งลูก; อื่นๆ
vi: Dạng chế biến dừa: Cắt khúc; Cắt hạt lựu; Nạo sợi mịn; Cắt đôi; Cùi dừa; Miếng nhỏ; Thịt dừa; Xay nhuyễn; Nạo sợi; Cắt lát; Nguyên quả; Khác
da: Forberedelsesform for kokosnød: Store stykker; I tern; Revet; Halveret; Kød; Stykker; Frugtkød; Puré; Strimlet; I skiver; Hel; Andet
bg-BG: Форма за приготвяне на кокос: На парчета; На кубчета; Настърган; Срязан наполовина; Месеста част; На парченца; Пулп; Пюре; На стърготини; На резенчета; Цял; Други
ko: 코코넛 가공 형태: 청크; 다이스; 그레이티드; 하프 컷; 과육; 조각; 펄프; 퓨레; 슈레드; 슬라이스; 홀; 기타
sl-SI: Oblika priprave kokosa: Večji kosi; Narezano na kocke; Naribano; Prerezano na pol; Meso; Kosi; Pulpa; Pire; Nastrgano; Rezine; Celo; Drugo
pt-BR: Forma de preparo do coco: Pedaços grandes; Em cubos; Ralado; Cortado ao meio; Carne; Pedaços; Polpa; Purê; Desfiado; Fatias; Inteiro; Outros
lt-LT: Kokosų paruošimo forma: Gabalai; Pjaustytas kubeliais; Tarkuotas; Perpjautas per pusę; Minkštimas; Gabalėliai; Minkštimo masė; Tyrė; Drožlės; Griežinėliai; Visas; Kita
cs: Forma na přípravu kokosu: Větší kousky; Nakrájený na kostičky; Nastrouhaný; Rozpůlený; Dužina; Kousky; Dřeň; Pyré; Strouhaný (na proužky); Plátky; Celý; Jiná